Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-913
Cash received; remit to State Treasurer; report to department.

All money derived from any source in any institution controlled by the Department of Correctional Services shall be remitted to the State Treasurer by the proper executive officer on the first day of each month. Detailed reports showing the source of all money received shall be made to the department every thirty days.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 65.